Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF520.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CENTRAL IRON RANGE SANITARY SEWER DISTRICT.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $1,400,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the Public Facilities Authority for a grant to the Central Iron Range Sanitary Sewer District to predesign, design, construct, furnish, and equip improvements and betterments of a capital nature to the district's infrastructure, including Great Scott Township/Buhl/Kinney conveyance capacity expansion and upgrades, Buhl lift station upgrades, and security upgrades and conveyance system infrastructure expansion along the Trunk Highway 169 corridor between Great Scott Township and Chisholm, for residential, industrial, and commercial development. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $1,400,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end